Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska 22-112
Butler.

The county of Butler is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township 13 north, range 4 east of the sixth principal meridian; thence north to the northeast corner of section 1, township 16 north, range 4 east; thence east to the southeast corner of section 36, township 17 north, range 4 east; thence north to a point on the east line of section 12, township 17 north, range 4 east, said point being 3826.58 feet south of the northeast corner of said section 12; thence westerly along the approximate middle of the Platte River, as shown in a survey by Richard L. Ronkar and Marvin L. Svoboda, dated November 25, 2002, and described as follows, assuming the east line of said section 12 to have a bearing of N 02° 00′ 09″ W; thence S 87° 05′ 20″ W, 5303.84 feet; thence S 60° 42′ 54″ W, 3499.34 feet; thence S 51° 23′ 46″ W, 3119.84 feet; thence S 64° 51′ 45″ W, 3555.38 feet; thence S 89° 20′ 58″ W, 1647.52 feet; thence S 50° 34′ 21″ W, 6032.08 feet; thence S 41° 15′ 33″ W, 4659.91 feet; thence S 44° 39′ 35″ W, 4912.16 feet; thence S 86° 23′ 58″ W, 4230.37 feet; thence S 81° 25′ 49″ W, 2159.16 feet; thence S 87° 58′ 51″ W, 7158.93 feet; thence S 54° 23′ 37″ W, 9629.02 feet; thence S 44° 41′ 16″ W, 3006.31 feet; thence S 68° 04′ 45″ W, 2463.21 feet; thence S 55° 58′ 42″ W, 1719.30 feet; thence S 88° 24′ 06″ W, 3797.21 feet; thence S 70° 01′ 06″ W, 2615.16 feet; thence S 61° 41′ 41″ W, 2023.42 feet; thence S 75° 32′ 12″ W, 1889.81 feet; thence N 89° 21′ 04″ W, 2850.07 feet; thence S 69° 54′ 10″ W, 6774.29 feet; thence N 84° 47′ 29″ W, 1169.64 feet; thence N 55° 45′ 56″ W, 5076.04 feet; thence N 76° 22′ 27″ W, 1755.30 feet; thence S 74° 42′ 27″ W, 3647.51 feet; thence S 78° 13′ 28″ W, 3012.24 feet; thence N 88° 59′ 00″ W, 2383.36 feet; thence N 86° 01′ 43″ W, 5433.64 feet, to a point on the east line of section 1, township 16 north, range 1 east, said point being 3711.01 feet south of the northeast corner of said section 1 and proceeding westerly, assuming the east line of said section 1 to have a bearing of N 02° 06′ 22″ E; thence N 70° 23′ 02″ W, 3275.26 feet; thence N 45° 07′ 33″ W, 3033.40 feet; thence N 53° 29′ 12″ W, 3663.43 feet; thence N 73° 40′ 09″ W, 2182.88 feet; thence S 87° 03′ 33″ W, 2685.73 feet; thence S 74° 49′ 57″ W, 4926.62 feet; thence S 64° 42′ 15″ W, 5633.14 feet; thence N 70° 16′ 39″ W, 3725.32 feet; thence N 70° 17′ 54″ W, 5359.26 feet, to a point on the west line of township 17 north, range 1 east, said point being 904.43 feet north of the southwest corner of said township; thence south to the southwest corner of township 13 north, range 1 east; thence east to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 6, p. 213;

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 109;

R.S.1913, § 825;

C.S.1922, § 727;

C.S.1929, § 25-114;

R.S.1943, § 22-112;

Laws 2000, LB 349, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 90, § 1.